Washington statutes.
RCW 43.113.020

Membership—Terms—Vacancies—Quorum—Expenses.

The commission shall consist of nine members, appointed by the governor. The commission shall make recommendations to the governor on appointment of the chair of the commission. The governor shall appoint the chair of the commission. To the extent practicable, appointments to the commission shall be made to achieve a balanced representation based on African American population distribution within the state, geographic considerations, sex, age, and occupation. Members shall serve three-year terms. However, of the initial appointees, one-third shall serve three-year terms, one-third shall serve two-year terms, and one-third shall serve a one-year term. In the case of a vacancy, appointment shall be for the remainder of the unexpired term. No member shall serve more than two full consecutive terms. Members shall be reimbursed for travel expenses incurred in the performance of their duties in accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060. Five members shall constitute a quorum for the purposes of conducting business.

[ 1992 c 96 s 3.]